Hawaii statutes.
[§321-402] Food safety consultative and
education program. (a) There is established the food safety consultative
and education program within the department of health. The department may
place this program within any appropriate division.

(b) The program shall be managed and staffed
by persons who are trained and experienced in public health aspects of food,
including food science, foodborne disease epidemiology, food microbiology, and
food sanitation.

(c) Generic food safety information gained from
studies conducted as part of the program may be shared with foodhandlers in
certification workshops and food safety classes. [L 1992, c 219, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next